Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
CHAPTER 351 Department for Natural Resources

351.010.
Definitions for chapter — Applicability.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Adulterated specimen” means a specimen containing a substance that is not a normal constituent or containing an endogenous substance at a concentration that is not a normal physiological concentration;

“Approved” means that a device, apparatus, equipment, or machinery, or practice employed in the mining of coal has been approved by the commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources;

“Assistant mine foreman” means a certified person designated to assist the mine foreman in the supervision of a portion or the whole of a mine or of the persons employed therein;

“Commercial mine” means any coal mine from which coal is mined for sale, commercial use, or exchange. This term shall in no instance be construed to include a mine where coal is produced for own use;

“Commission” means the Mine Safety Review Commission created by KRS

351.1041

;

“Commissioner” means commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources;

“Department” means the Department for Natural Resources;

“Drift” means an opening through strata or coal seams with opening grades sufficient to permit coal to be hauled therefrom or which is used for the purpose of ventilation, drainage, ingress, egress, and other purposes in connection with the mining of coal;

“Excavations and workings” means the excavated portions of a mine;

“Fire boss” (often referred to as mine examiner) means a person certified as a mine foreman or assistant mine foreman who is designated by management to examine a mine or part of a mine for explosive gas or other dangers before a shift crew enters;

“Gassy mine.” All mines shall be classified as gassy or gaseous;

“Illicit substances” includes prescription drugs used illegally or in excess of therapeutic levels as well as illegal drugs;

“Intake air” means air that has not passed through the last working place of the split or by the unsealed entrances to abandoned workings and by analysis contains not less than nineteen and one-half percent (19.5%) oxygen, no dangerous quantities of flammable gas, and no harmful amounts of poisonous gas or dust;

“Licensee” means any owner, operator, lessee, corporation, partnership, or other person who procures a license from the department to operate a coal mine;

“Medical review officer” or “MRO” means a licensed physician with knowledge of substance abuse disorders, laboratory testing, chain of custody, collection procedures, and the ability to verify positive, confirmed test results. The MRO shall possess the necessary medical training to interpret and evaluate a positive test result in relation to the person’s medical history or any other relevant biomedical information;

“Mine” means any open pit or any underground workings from which coal is produced for sale, exchange, or commercial use, and all shafts, slopes, drifts, or inclines leading thereto, and includes all buildings and equipment, above or below the surface of the ground, used in connection with the workings. Workings that are adjacent to each other and under the same management, but which are administered as distinct units, shall be considered a separate mine;

“Mine foreman” means a certified person whom the licensee or superintendent places in charge of the workings of the mine and of the persons employed therein;

“Mine manager” means a certified or noncertified person whom the licensee places in charge of a mine or mines and whose duties include but are not limited to operations at the mine or mines and supervision of personnel when qualified to do so;

“Open-pit mine” shall include open excavations and open-cut workings, including but not limited to auger operations and highwall mining systems for the extraction of coal. However, excavation of refuse from a coarse coal refuse fill for reprocessing of the refuse, which is permitted and bonded under KRS Chapter 350 and is regulated by the Mine Safety and Health Administration, shall not be required to obtain a license under this chapter;

“Operator” means the licensee, owner, lessee, or other person who operates or controls a coal mine;

“Permissible” refers to any equipment, device, or explosive that has been approved by the United States Bureau of Mines, the Mining Enforcement and Safety Administration, or the Mine Safety and Health Administration and that meets all requirements, restrictions, exceptions, limitations, and conditions attached to the classification by the approving agency;

“Preshift examination” means the examination of a mine or any portion thereof where miners are scheduled to work or travel, which shall be conducted not more than three (3) hours before any oncoming shift;

“Return air” means air that has passed through the last active working place on each split, or air that has passed through abandoned, inaccessible, or pillared workings;

“Serious physical injury” means an injury which has a reasonable potential to cause death;

“Shaft” means a vertical opening through the strata that is used in connection with the mining of coal, for the purpose of ventilation or drainage, or for hoisting men, coal, or materials;

“Slope” means an inclined opening used for the same purpose as a shaft;

“Superintendent” means the person who, on behalf of the licensee, has immediate supervision of one (1) or more mines;

“Supervisory personnel” means a person certified under the provisions of this chapter to assist in the supervision of a portion or the whole of the mine or of the persons employed therein;

“Division” means the Division of Mine Safety;

“Director” means the director of the Division of Mine Safety;

“Probation” means the status of a certification or license issued by the Division of Mine Safety that conditions the validity of the certification or license upon compliance with orders of the Mine Safety Review Commission; and

“Final order of the commission” means an order which has not been appealed to the Franklin Circuit Court within thirty (30) days of entry, or an order affirming the commission’s order that has been entered by any court within the Commonwealth and for which all appeals have been exhausted.

Except as the context otherwise requires, this chapter applies only to commercial coal mines.

The definitions in KRS

352.010

apply also to this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise.

History.

2739-1: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 120, § 1; 1952, ch. 162, § 1; 1966, ch. 255, § 257; 1972, ch. 298, § 1; 1976, ch. 174, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 17, effective December 22, 1976; 1978, ch. 301, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 308, § 1, effective April 9, 1996; 2000, ch. 104, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 149, § 3, effective March 20, 2001; 2002, ch. 355, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 123, § 56, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 185, § 6, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 241, § 8, effective July 12, 2006; 2012, ch. 89, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 87, § 7, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 117, § 29, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

Commissioner's Notes

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by
1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor's signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

351.020.
Commissioner of Department for Natural Resources — Functions.

The Department for Natural Resources shall be headed by the commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources.

The department shall administer all laws of the Commonwealth relating to mines.

History.

2739-2, 2739-3, 3766b-15, 4618-38: amend. Acts 2000, ch. 104, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 123, § 57, effective June 20, 2005.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Oil and gas laws, Department to enforce, KRS

353.200

.

351.021.
“Chief” refers to “Commissioner.” [Repealed.]

351.025.
Duties of department relating to mine safety — Administrative regulations.

The department shall:

Promulgate administrative regulations that establish comprehensive criteria for the imposition and enforcement of sanctions against certified and noncertified personnel and owners and part-owners of licensed premises whose intentional violation of, or order to violate, mine safety laws places miners in imminent danger of serious injury or death. These criteria shall include but not be limited to the following:

In the case of individuals that are certified miners, the Mine Safety Review Commission may revoke or suspend an individual’s certification, or probate an individual’s certification for first offenses, and the Mine Safety Review Commission shall establish a maximum penalty for subsequent offenses;

In the case of individuals that are owners or part-owners of licensed premises, the Mine Safety Review Commission may impose civil monetary penalties against individuals not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000); and

In the case of noncertified personnel, the Mine Safety Review Commission may impose civil monetary fines equivalent to the value of the wages they receive for up to ten (10) working days for first offenses and the commission shall establish maximum penalties for subsequent offenses;

Notwithstanding KRS 351.070(15), promulgate administrative regulations that establish comprehensive criteria for the Mine Safety Review Commission’s imposition of penalties against licensed premises for violations of mine safety laws that place miners in imminent danger of serious injury or death. These penalties shall include but not be limited to the revocation or suspension of the mine’s license, the probation of a mine’s license, or the imposition of a penalty against the licensee not to exceed the gross value of the production of the licensed premise for up to ten (10) working days;

Direct that an employer shall not directly or indirectly reimburse a sanctioned miner or mine supervisor for days of work lost as a result of sanctions imposed by the Mine Safety Review Commission;

Establish procedures by which the department shall communicate with the Federal Mine Safety and Health Administration (MSHA) concerning allegations of mine safety violations against Kentucky coal operators and miners and for reports made to the division under KRS

351.193

;

Jointly with the Mine Safety Review Commission establish a process for referring allegations of mine safety violations to the Mine Safety Review Commission for adjudication and for the hearing of appeals from penalties imposed by the division, and the underlying violation, authorized under KRS 351.070(15); and

Establish procedures to distribute quarterly reports to every licensed entity describing mine fatalities, serious mine accidents, and penalties imposed on certified and noncertified personnel and licensed premises and to require the report to be distributed to every certified working miner employed by the licensed entity, posted at work sites, and reviewed at regular mine safety meetings.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 149, § 6, effective March 20, 2001; 2006, ch. 185, § 7, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 94, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2015 ch. 87, § 8, effective June 24, 2015.

351.030.
Hearings before department — Petition for intervention.

All administrative hearings conducted by the department shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B and this section. Following the hearing, the department shall decide each matter in controversy. No person shall be discharged or otherwise discriminated against by his or her employer for testifying, or for his failure to testify, at these hearings.

The executor or administrator of a deceased miner’s estate, or his or her designee, in the case of a fatality, miners that are injured as a result of an accident, and miners that are significantly affected by the conduct that gave rise to a disciplinary proceeding shall be granted the right of intervention in the penalty phase of that proceeding. The petition for intervention shall be made in accordance with KRS 13B.060(3). All hearings before the Mine Safety Review Commission shall be open proceedings. Any party with pertinent information regarding a mine accident may submit that information directly to the division’s chief accident investigator.

HISTORY:

3766b-16: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 298, § 2; 1996, ch. 308, § 2, effective April 9, 1996; 1996, ch. 318, § 330, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 104, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 94, § 2, effective June 26, 2007; 2015 ch. 87, § 9, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Notes, Energy v. Environment: Who Wins in the Race for Coal in Kentucky, 64 Ky. L.J. 641 (1975-76).

351.040.
Action to vacate order of department — Appeal.

Any party in interest dissatisfied with an order of the department may commence an equitable action against the department and other interested parties as defendants, to vacate or set aside, in whole or in part, any such order. The action shall be brought in the Circuit Court of the county where the subject matter involved in the order, or the well or workable coal bed or part thereof, is located. The court may grant relief from any unlawful or unreasonable order of the department, and render such judgment as appears to it to be equitable and just.

The pendency of the action shall not of itself suspend the operation of the order of the department, but during the pendency of the action any party may secure from the court an order suspending or staying the operation of the order of the department pending the action by giving to the other parties adequate security, approved by the court, against loss due to the delay in enforcement of the order, in case the order under review is not set aside, and the court may, without security being given, suspend the operation of the order, in whole or in part, on such terms as it deems just and in accordance with the practice of courts of equity; provided, however, that the operation of an order pertaining to safety in coal mines shall not be suspended temporarily pending final decision of the court.

Appeals may be taken to the Court of Appeals as in other cases.

History.

3766b-17: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 2; 2000, ch. 104, § 4, effective July 14, 2000.

351.050.
Commissioner — Appointment — Term — Oath. [Repealed.]

351.051.
Commissioner — Appointment. [Repealed.]

351.060.
Qualifications of director of Division of Mine Safety.

The director of the Division of Mine Safety shall be a citizen of Kentucky and shall be thoroughly familiar with all methods of safety pertaining to the operation of mines.

The director shall have a practical knowledge of:

The different systems of working and ventilating coal mines;

The nature, chemistry, and properties of noxious, poisonous, and explosive gases, the dangers due to these gases, and the prevention of these dangers;

The dangers incident to blasting and the prevention of these dangers;

The methods for the management and extinguishment of mine fires;

The methods for rescue and relief work in mine disasters;

The application of electricity in mining operations;

The application of mechanical loading in mining operations;

The equipment and explosives manufactured for use in coal mines;

The methods used in locating oil and gas wells when drilled through any coal seam;

The proper manner of drilling and plugging oil and gas wells;

Mining engineering; and

The methods for the prevention of explosions in mines due to gas or dust.

The director shall be capable of efficiently reporting on any proposed development in mining operations or the possibility of operating any coal or clay seam.

The director shall hold a mine inspector’s or mine safety specialist’s certificate.

HISTORY:

2739-4: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 386, § 64; 1976, ch. 86, § 14; 1996, ch. 308, § 3, effective April 9, 1996; 2005, ch. 123, § 58, effective June 20, 2005; 2015 ch. 87, § 10, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Notes, Energy v. Environment: Who Wins in the Race for Coal in Kentucky, 64 Ky. L.J. 641 (1975-76).

351.070.
Duties of the commissioner — Office of Mine Safety and Licensing — Secretary may promulgate administrative regulations — Financial liaison — Civil monetary penalties.

The commissioner shall have full authority over the department and shall superintend and direct the activities of the mine safety specialists and other personnel of the department. There is created within the Department for Natural Resources a Division of Mine Safety.

The secretary shall appoint a director to the Division of Mine Safety in accordance with KRS

224.10-020

(2) and prescribe his or her powers and duties.

The commissioner may, whenever necessary, divide the coal fields of the state into as many inspection regions as necessary, so as to equalize as nearly as practicable the work of each mine safety specialist, and may assign to the specialists their respective regions.

The commissioner may, whenever he or she deems it necessary in the interest of efficient supervision of the mines, temporarily employ the services of additional mine safety specialists or change specialists from one (1) region to another.

The commissioner shall superintend and direct the inspection of mines and cause to be investigated the character and quality of air in mines whenever conditions indicate the necessity of doing so.

The commissioner shall collect statistics relating to coal mining in the state and make an annual report of the statistics.

The commissioner shall see that maps, plans, projections, and proposed developments of all underground coal mines are made and filed in his office.

The commissioner shall keep a properly indexed, permanent record of all inspections made by himself and the personnel of the department.

The commissioner shall exercise general supervision over the training of officials and workmen in safety and first aid and mine rescue methods, and may conduct demonstrations in safety whenever he deems it advisable.

The commissioner shall exercise general supervision over the dissemination of information among officials and employees concerning mine ventilation, mining methods, and mine accidents and their prevention, and shall assume full charge in the event of mine fire or explosion or other serious accident at any mine in the state.

The commissioner may assist in the resumption of operations of any mine or gather data for the development of any coal seams that would be of any benefit to the state or create new employment.

The commissioner may prescribe reasonable safety standards governing the use of explosives, and electrical and mechanical equipment in the operation of open-pit or surface mines.

The secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet shall have the power and authority to promulgate, amend, or rescind any administrative regulations he or she deems necessary and suitable for the proper administration of this chapter. Administrative regulations may be promulgated, amended, or rescinded by the secretary only after public hearing or an opportunity to be heard thereon of which proper notice by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424, has been given. Administrative regulations so promulgated shall carry the full force and effect of law.

The commissioner shall ascertain the cause or causes of any coal mining fatality and any accidents involving serious physical injury and, within sixty (60) days of completion of the investigation, shall report his or her findings and recommendations to the Governor, the Mine Safety Review Commission, and the Legislative Research Commission. Accident interviews conducted by the division shall be closed proceedings. The recommendations may include without being limited to the need to promulgate or amend administrative regulations to prevent the recurrence of the conditions causing the fatality. Effective January 1, 2009, the division shall appoint an existing full-time employee to act as a family liaison. The family liaison shall have the responsibility during an accident investigation to keep the families of miners informed of the progress and findings of the accident investigation. The family liaison shall be trained in mining and in grief counseling.

The commissioner shall assess civil monetary penalties against licensed facilities for violations of laws in this chapter and KRS Chapter 352 pertaining to roof control plans, mine seal construction plans, unsafe working conditions, and mine ventilation plans that could lead to imminent danger or serious physical injury. The Energy and Environment Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations within ninety (90) days of July 12, 2006, providing for the manner and method of the assessment of the penalties and appeals therefrom. In no event shall the civil penalty assessed pursuant to this subsection for the violation exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to impair or contravene the authority granted under KRS 351.025(2) for imposing penalties against licensed facilities.

HISTORY:

2739-7: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 4; 1966, ch. 239, § 210; 1972, ch. 298, § 4; 1994, ch. 488, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 308, § 4, effective April 9, 1996; 2001, ch. 149, § 4, effective March 20, 2001; 2005, ch. 123, § 59, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 185, § 8, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 94, § 3, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 1897, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 87, § 11, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 117, § 30, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Under the authority granted by this section, the commissioner could adopt a regulation requiring a member of the supervisory personnel to be present with a crew working out by the loading point of an underground mine.

OAG 77-320

.

The Mining Board is given the power and the obligation by KRS 351.105(11) to formally review and approve all administrative regulations proposed by the Department of Natural Resources that relate to the mining of coal, penalties, or the certification of miners before those administrative regulations are promulgated. The Mining Board does not have the power to review and approve regulations promulgated by the secretary of the Environmental and Public Protection Cabinet under KRS 351.070(13).

OAG 10-010

, 2010 Ky. AG LEXIS 243.

351.073.
Moratorium on regulations — Exceptions. [Repealed.]

351.075.
Exceptions to mandatory mine safety standards.

Upon petition by the operator or the representative of miners, the commissioner may modify the application of any mandatory safety standard to a mine if the commissioner determines that an alternative method of achieving the result of such standard exists which will at all times guarantee no less than the same measure of protection afforded the miners of such mine by such standard, or that the application of such standard to such mine will result in a diminution of safety to the miners in such mine. Upon receipt of such petition, the commissioner shall give notice to the operator or the representative of miners in the affected mine, as appropriate, and shall cause such investigation to be made as he deems appropriate. Such investigation shall provide an opportunity for a public hearing, at the request of such operator or representative or other interested party, to enable the operator and the representative of miners in such mine or other interested party to present information relating to the modification of such standard.

The commissioner shall issue a decision incorporating his findings of fact therein, and shall send a copy thereof to the operator or the representative of the miners, as appropriate. Before granting any exception to a mandatory safety standard, the findings of the commissioner or his authorized representative shall be made available to the representative of the miners at the affected coal mine.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 16.

351.080.
Offices of mine inspectors.

The offices of the mine inspectors shall be at such places within their respective districts as the commissioner designates, and each mine inspector shall be provided with a suitable office.

History.

2739-6: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 5; 1972, ch. 298, § 5; 1990, ch. 325, § 18, effective July 13, 1990.

351.090.
Mine inspectors — Appointment — Qualifications — Oath and bond — Background check.

The Governor shall appoint an adequate number of mine safety specialists to ensure at least two (2) inspections annually at all surface mines, provided the mine is in operation the entire year or the proportionate thereof, of all mines in the Commonwealth and sufficient additional mine safety specialists to enable the commissioner to provide adequate monitoring of coal mines where conditions or management policy dictate that more inspections are needed to ensure the safety of miners. Underground mines shall be inspected at least six (6) times annually; except that the commissioner shall have the discretion to require up to three (3) of the six (6) required mine safety inspections to be mine safety analysis visits pursuant to KRS

351.242

. At least one (1) inspection shall be a full electrical inspection. One (1) or more of the appointees shall be designated as electrical mine inspectors. The Governor shall also appoint an adequate number of mine safety specialists to perform safety analysis and safety instruction. The term of office of each mine safety specialist shall be during the period of capable, efficient service and good behavior.

All mine safety specialists shall have a thorough knowledge of first aid and mine rescue and be able to instruct in first aid and mine rescue and shall have a thorough and practical knowledge of mining gained by at least five (5) years’ experience in coal mines in the Commonwealth. For the purposes of this subsection, a degree in mining engineering from a recognized institution shall be deemed equivalent to two (2) years of practical experience in coal mines or an associate degree in mining technology from a recognized institution shall be deemed equivalent to one (1) year practical experience in coal mines. A person desiring to use a mining engineering or technology degree for practical experience credit shall file proof of having received a degree prior to examination.

No person shall be appointed to the office of mine safety specialist unless he or she holds a current mine foreman’s certificate. A person appointed as mine safety specialist shall pass an examination administered by the department. The commissioner may recommend to the Governor applicants for the positions of mine safety specialist who have successfully passed the examination and are proved by worth, training, and experience to be the most competent of the applicants.

Mine safety specialists shall be of good moral character and temperate habits and shall not, while holding office, act in any official capacity in operating any coal mine.

No reimbursement for traveling expenses shall be made except on an itemized accounting for the expenses submitted by mine safety specialists who shall verify upon oath that the expenses were incurred in the discharge of their official duties.

Each mine safety specialist shall take oath, which shall be certified by the officer administering it. The oath, in writing, and the certificate, shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

Each mine inspector, mine safety analyst, electrical inspector, and mine safety instructor shall give bond with surety approved by the Governor.

Each mine safety specialist shall provide authorization to the division to perform a criminal background check by means of a fingerprint check by the Department of Kentucky State Police. The results of the state criminal background check shall be sent to the director of the division. Any fee charged by the Department of Kentucky State Police shall be an amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request and conducting the search.

History.

2739-15, 2739-16: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 120, § 2; 1952, ch. 162, § 6; 1972, ch. 298, § 6; 1978, ch. 301, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 370, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 323, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 308, § 5, effective April 9, 1996; 1998, ch. 480, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 104, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 355, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 185, § 9, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 94, § 4, effective January 1, 2009; 2015 ch. 87, § 12, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 72, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 117, § 31, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 85, § 9, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2009). 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, relating to the creation and organization of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, instructs the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in that Act. Such a correction has been made in this section.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Mine safety committee members who are appointed by a majority union or elected by a majority of miners would not be “mine safety inspectors.”

OAG 76-337

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Conditions of bond, penal sum, KRS

62.060

.

Subordinate appointments, department heads may make, KRS

12.050

,

12.060

.

351.100.
Board of examiners for mine inspectors — Use of license fees. [Repealed.]

351.101.
Declaration of legislative finding of fact.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares the following:

The highest priority and concern of the Commonwealth must be the health and safety of the coal industry’s most valuable resource, the miner.

The continued prosperity of the coal industry is of primary importance to the state.

A high priority must be given to increasing the productivity and competitiveness of the mines in this state.

An inordinate number of miners are killed or injured during the first few months of their experience in a mine and upon acquiring new work assignments in a mine.

These injuries result in the loss of life and serious injury to miners and are an impediment to the future growth of the state’s coal industry.

Mining is a technical occupation with various specialties requiring individualized training and education.

Injuries can be reduced through proper miner training, education, and certification.

Mine safety can be improved by the imposition and enforcement of sanctions against licensed premises and certified and noncertified personnel whose willful and repeated violations of mine safety laws place miners in imminent danger of serious injury or death.

Abuse of illicit substances and alcohol in the mining industry represents a serious threat to the health and safety of all miners. Substance and alcohol abuse adversely affect the health and safety of miners. Mine safety can be significantly improved by establishing as a condition of certification that miners remain drug and alcohol free.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 1; 2001, ch. 149, § 1, effective March 20, 2001; 2006, ch. 241, § 9, effective July 12, 2006.

351.102.
Certificate of competency and qualification or permit as trainee required — Proof of drug- and alcohol-free status to be submitted — Examinations — Hearing — Appeals.

No person shall be assigned mining duties by a licensee as a laborer or supervisor unless the person holds a valid certificate of competency and qualification or a valid permit as trainee issued in accordance with this section.

The division shall require that all applicants for certified miner and initial applicants for other mining certifications pursuant to this chapter shall submit proof that he or she is drug and alcohol free. The proof shall be submitted in accordance with KRS

351.182

and

351.183

.

A permit as trainee miner shall be issued by the commissioner to any person who has submitted proof that he or she is drug and alcohol free in accordance with KRS

351.182

and

351.183

, and has completed a program of education of a minimum of forty (40) hours for underground mining or twenty-four (24) hours for surface mining comprised of sixteen (16) hours of classroom training and eight (8) hours of mine specifics or who has completed a certified mine technology program and has passed an examination approved by the commissioner. An additional eight (8) hours of mine-specific training shall be administered to the trainee miner by the licensee, which training shall be documented on a form approved by the commissioner. This education and training program shall be determined and established by the department, as provided in KRS

351.106

. A requirement for a permit as a trainee miner shall be one (1) hour of classroom training dedicated to alcohol and substance abuse education.

Trainee miners shall work within the sight and sound of a certified miner.

Any miner holding a certificate of competency and qualification may have one (1) person working with him and under his direction as a trainee miner. Any person certified as a mine foreman or assistant mine foreman shall have no more than five (5) persons working under his supervision or direction as trainee miners for the purpose of learning and being instructed in the duties of underground coal mining.

A certificate of competency and qualification as a miner shall be issued by the commissioner to any person who has a minimum of forty-five (45) working days’ experience within a thirty-six (36) month period as a trainee miner and demonstrated competence as a miner. Any trainee miner who exceeds six (6) months in obtaining the forty-five (45) working days of experience required in this section, shall submit proof of alcohol- and drug-free status in accordance with the provisions of KRS

351.182

and

351.183

.

All examinations for the certification of a miner shall be of a practical nature and shall determine the competency and qualification of the applicant to engage in the mining of coal with reasonable safety to himself and his fellow employees. The examination may be given orally, upon approval by the commissioner, if the miner is unable to read or comprehend a written examination.

Examinations shall be held in any regional office during regular business hours.

If the commissioner or his authorized representative finds that an applicant is not qualified and competent, he shall notify the applicant as soon as possible, but in no case more than thirty (30) days after the date of examination.

Any applicant aggrieved by an action of the commissioner or his authorized representative in failing or refusing to issue a certificate of qualification and competency shall, within ten (10) days of notice of the action complained of, appeal to the commissioner who shall either affirm the action or issue the certificate to the applicant.

If the applicant is aggrieved by the action of the commissioner, he may appeal to the commission which shall hold a hearing on the matter in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

The applicant may appeal from the final order of the commission by filing in the Franklin Circuit Court a petition for appeal in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 2; 1978, ch. 301, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 114, § 100, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 308, § 6, effective April 9, 1996; 1996, ch. 318, § 331, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 149, § 8, effective March 20, 2001; 2002, ch. 355, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 241, § 10, effective July 12, 2006; 2015 ch. 87, § 13, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 117, § 32, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/14/2000). The reference to KRS

351.105

in subsection (2) of this section has been changed to KRS

351.106

under KRS 7.136(1)(e). Treatment of the “education and training program” formerly contained in KRS

351.105

was transferred to KRS

351.106

by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308, secs. 7 and 8.

(7/15/96). This section was amended by 1996 Ky. Acts chs. 308 and 318. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 308, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This chapter does not require an operator to train an employee so that the employee can initially meet state licensing standards necessary to work underground for the purpose of mining coal.

OAG 80-282

.

351.103.
Eligibility of mining specialists to work as miners.

All persons possessing valid certificates as mine inspectors, electrical inspectors, mine safety instructors, assistant mine foreman, mine foreman, shotfirer, and other mining specialties as established by the department , or certified miner shall be eligible to work at any time as miners, provided they fulfill the annual requirements for retraining and reeducation as provided in KRS

351.106

.

Supervisory, clerical, and technically trained employees of the mine operator whose work contributes only indirectly to mine operations shall not be required to possess a miner’s certificate of competency and qualification.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 3; 2000, ch. 104, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 241, § 11, effective July 12, 2006; 2017 ch. 117, § 33, effective June 29, 2017.

351.104.
Certification of miners employed prior to date of training program establishment. [Repealed.]